Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1541
Activities pass; volunteer, defined.

For purposes of section 85-1542, volunteer shall mean a person who is not an elected or appointed official or employee of a community college area who, at the request or with the permission of the board of governors of the community college area, engages in activities related to the purposes and functions of the community college area or for its general benefit.

Laws 1994, LB 1310, § 14.